Utah statutes.
26-9-3.   Rural health development initiatives.

(1) (a)  The University of Utah Health Science Center shall use any appropriations it receives for developing area health education centers to establish and maintain an area health education center program in accordance with this section.

(b)  Implementation and execution of the area health education center program is contingent upon appropriations from the Legislature.

(2) (a)  The area health education center program shall consist of a central program office at the University of Utah Health Science Center.  The program office shall establish and operate a statewide, decentralized, regional program with emphasis on addressing rural health professions workforce education and training needs.

(b)  The area health education center program shall have five regional centers serving the following geographic areas:

(i)  the northern center serving Box Elder, Cache, Rich, Weber, and Morgan counties;

(ii)  the crossroads center serving Salt Lake, Wasatch, Summit, Tooele, Utah, and Davis counties;

(iii)  the central center serving Juab, Millard, Piute, Sanpete, Sevier, and Wayne counties;

(iv)  the eastern center serving Carbon, Daggett, Duchesne, Emery, Grand, San Juan, and Uintah counties; and

(v)  the southwest center serving Beaver, Garfield, Iron, Kane, and Washington counties.

(3)  The area health education center program shall attempt to acquire funding from state, local, federal, and private sources.

(4)  Each area health education center shall provide community-based health professions education programming for the geographic area described in Subsection (2)(b) of this section.



Amended by Chapter 95, 2001 General Session

